Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 6. Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act.

Sec. 29.45.750.
Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act.

The provisions of 4 U.S.C. 116 — 126 (Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act) are incorporated in this chapter by reference and have effect as though fully set out in this chapter.

A municipality that levies and collects a sales tax on mobile telecommunications services shall do so in accordance with the provisions of 4 U.S.C. 116 — 126 (Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act).

The procedures and remedies for correcting a tax, charge, fee, or assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction are as follows:

if a customer believes that an amount of tax, charge, or fee or an assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction included on a billing is erroneous, the customer shall notify the home service provider; the customer shall notify the home service provider of the street address for the customer’s place of primary use, the account name and number for which the customer seeks a correction, a description of the error asserted by the customer, and any other information that the home service provider reasonably requires to process the request;

within 60 days after receiving a notice under this section, the home service provider shall review the records and the electronic database or enhanced zip code used according to 4 U.S.C. 116 — 126 to determine the customer’s taxing jurisdiction; if this review shows that the amount of tax, charge, or fee or assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction is in error, the home service provider shall correct the error and refund or credit the amount of tax, charge, or fee erroneously collected from the customer for a period of up to two years; if this review shows that the amount of tax, charge, or fee or assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction is correct, the home service provider shall provide a written explanation to the customer;

the procedures in this subsection are the first course of remedy available to a customer seeking correction of assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction or a refund of or other compensation for taxes, charges, and fees erroneously collected by the home service provider.

For purposes of this section, if a customer does not have a street address, the home service provider may accept from the customer as the customer’s place of primary use an address that is not a street address if the address gives effect to the intent of 4 U.S.C. 116 — 126 (Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act).

History.

(§ 5 ch 100 SLA 2002)

Conditional repeal of section. —

Under § 6,
ch. 100, SLA 2002, this section is repealed. Under § 9,
ch. 100, SLA 2002, this repeal takes effect only “if a court of competent jurisdiction whose decisions are binding in this state enters a final judgment on the merits that is based on federal law, is no longer subject to appeal or petition for certiorari, and substantially limits or impairs the essential elements of
4 U.S.C. 116 — 126.” Under § 11,
ch. 100, SLA 2002, the effective date of the repeal is “the day after the last day on which the judgment described in § 9 . . . could have been appealed.” As of May 2022, this contingency had not occurred.

Cross references. —

AS

29.10.200

provides that this section applies to home rule municipalities.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 8, ch. 100, SLA 2002 provides that “notwithstanding AS

01.10.030

, the provisions of this Act are not severable.”